Utah statutes.
53-6-209.   Termination of employment -- Change of status form.

(1)  When a peace officer's employment terminates, the employing agency shall submit a change of status form noting the termination of the peace officer to the division.

(2)  The change of status form shall:

(a)  be completed and submitted within seven days of the peace officer's termination date;

(b)  identify the circumstances of the peace officer's status change by indicating that the peace officer has resigned, retired, terminated, transferred, deceased, or that the peace officer's name has changed;

(c)  indicate the effective date of action; and

(d)  indicate the name of the new employer, if the status change is due to a transfer.

(3)  Any person or agency who intentionally falsifies, misrepresents, or fails to give notice of the change of status of a peace officer is liable to the division for any damages that may be sustained by the failure to make the notification.

